Washington statutes.
RCW 39.53.140

Issuance of general obligation refunding bonds to refund general obligation or revenue bonds.

Any public body may issue general obligation refunding bonds to refund any general obligation or revenue bonds of such issuer or its agencies or instrumentalities. The payment of general obligation refunding bonds may be additionally secured by a pledge of the revenues pledged to the payment of the revenue bonds to be refunded.

If the payment of revenue bonds to be refunded by general obligation bonds of the state is secured by (1) fees collected by the state as license fees for motor vehicles, or (2) excise taxes collected by the state on the sale, distribution or use of motor vehicle fuel, or (3) interest on the permanent school fund, then the state shall also pledge to the payment of such refunding bonds the same fees, excise taxes, or interest that were pledged to the payment of the revenue bonds to be refunded.

Any public body may issue revenue refunding bonds to refund any general obligation of such issuer or its agencies or instrumentalities if the bonds to be refunded were issued for purposes for which those revenue refunding bonds could be issued.

[ 1999 c 230 s 12; 1974 ex.s. c 111 s 4; 1973 1st ex.s. c 25 s 7.]

NOTES:

Application—Construction—Severability—1999 c 230: See notes following RCW 39.53.010.

Severability—1974 ex.s. c 111: See note following RCW 39.42.080.